Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2414
Informal probate or appointment proceedings; application; contents.

Applications for informal probate or informal appointment shall be directed to the registrar and verified by the applicant to be accurate and complete to the best of the applicant's knowledge and belief as to the following information:

(1) Every application for informal probate of a will or for informal appointment of a personal representative, other than a special or successor representative, shall contain the following:

(i) a statement of the interest of the applicant;

(ii) the name and date of death of the decedent, the decedent's age, and the county and state of domicile at the time of death, and the names and addresses of the spouse, children, heirs and devisees and the ages of any who are minors so far as known or ascertainable with reasonable diligence by the applicant;

(iii) if the decedent was not domiciled in the state at the time of death, a statement showing venue;

(iv) a statement identifying and indicating the address of any personal representative of the decedent appointed in this state or elsewhere whose appointment has not been terminated;

(v) a statement indicating whether the applicant has received a demand for notice or is aware of any demand for notice of any probate or appointment proceeding concerning the decedent that may have been filed in this state or elsewhere.

(2) An application for informal probate of a will shall state the following in addition to the statements required by subdivision (1) of this section:

(i) that the original of the decedent's last will or an authenticated copy of a will probated in another jurisdiction:

(A) is in the possession of the court;

(B) accompanies the application; or

(C) is in the possession of the applicant, that the applicant will deliver such original or authenticated copy to the court within ten days after the filing of the application, and that a true and accurate copy of such original or authenticated copy accompanies the application;

(ii) that the applicant, to the best of the applicant's knowledge, believes the will to have been validly executed; and

(iii) that after the exercise of reasonable diligence the applicant is unaware of any instrument revoking the will, and that the applicant believes that the instrument which is the subject of the application is the decedent's last will.

(3) An application for informal appointment of a personal representative to administer an estate under a will shall describe the will by date of execution and state the time and place of probate or the pending application or petition for probate. The application for appointment shall adopt the statements in the application or petition for probate and state the name, address and priority for appointment of the person whose appointment is sought.

(4) An application for informal appointment of an administrator in intestacy shall state, in addition to the statements required by subdivision (1) of this section:

(i) that after the exercise of reasonable diligence the applicant is unaware of any unrevoked testamentary instrument relating to property having a situs in this state under section 30-2210, or a statement why any such instrument of which the applicant may be aware is not being probated;

(ii) the priority of the person whose appointment is sought and the names of any other persons having a prior or equal right to the appointment under section 30-2412.

(5) An application for appointment of a personal representative to succeed a personal representative appointed under a different testacy status shall refer to the order in the most recent testacy proceeding, state the name and address of the person whose appointment is sought and of the person whose appointment will be terminated if the application is granted, and describe the priority of the applicant.

(6) An application for appointment of a personal representative to succeed a personal representative who has tendered a resignation as provided in subsection (c) of section 30-2453, or whose appointment has been terminated by death or removal, shall adopt the statements in the application or petition which led to the appointment of the person being succeeded except as specifically changed or corrected, state the name and address of the person who seeks appointment as successor, and describe the priority of the applicant.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 92, UPC § 3-301;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 9;

Laws 2020, LB966, § 14.